Utah statutes.
78B-15-617.   Rules for adjudication of paternity.
The tribunal shall apply the following rules to adjudicate the paternity of a
child:
(1)  The paternity of a child having a presumed, declarant, or adjudicated
father may be disproved only by admissible results of genetic testing
excluding that man as the father of the child or identifying another man as
the father of the child.
(2)  Unless the results of genetic testing are admitted to rebut other results
of genetic testing, a man identified as the father of a child under Section
78B-15-505 must be adjudicated the father of the child, unless an exception is
granted under Section 78B-15-608.
(3)  If the tribunal finds that genetic testing under Section 78B-15-505
neither identifies nor excludes a man as the father of a child, the tribunal
may not dismiss the proceeding.  In that event, the tribunal shall order
further testing.
(4)  Unless the results of genetic testing are admitted to rebut other results
of genetic testing, a man properly excluded as the father of a child by
genetic testing must be adjudicated not to be the father of the child.
